en: Canned pineapple chunks
sv: Burkananas i bitar, Ananasbitar på burk, Ananas i bitar på burk

en: Canned mixed fruits, Canned fruit cocktails
da: Blandede frugter på dåse
sv: Blandade frukter på burk

en: Lemons in syrup, Canned lemons in syrup
fr: Citrons au sirop

en: Oranges in syrup, Canned Oranges in syrup
fr: Oranges au sirop

en: Apples in syrup, Canned Apples in syrup
fr: Pommes au sirop

en: Sugarcanes in syrup, Sugar canes in syrup
fr: Cannes à sucre au sirop

en: Figs in syrup
fr: Figues au sirop

en: Muskmelons in syrup
fr: Melons au sirop

en: Grapes in syrup
fr: Raisins au sirop

en: Rhubarb in syrup, Rhubarb stalks in syrup
fr: Rhubarbe au sirop, Tiges de rhubarbe au sirop

en: Cranberries in syrup
fr: Canneberges au sirop

en: Redcurrants in syrup, red currants in syrup
fr: Groseilles au sirop

en: Blackberries in syrup
fr: Mûres au sirop

en: Blueberries in syrup
fr: Myrtilles au sirop

en: Kiwifruits in syrup, Kiwis in syrup
fr: Kiwis au sirop

en: Coconut kernel in syrup, Coconut in syrup
fr: Chair de noix de coco au sirop, noix de coco au sirop

en: Papayas in syrup
fr: Papayes au sirop

en: Fruits in syrup, Canned fruits in syrup
bg: Плодове в сироп
de: Früchte in Sirup
es: Frutas en almíbar, Frutas en conserva en almíbar, Conservas de frutas en almíbar
fi: hedelmiä sokerisiirapissa
fr: Fruits au sirop
he: פירות בסירופ
hr: Voće u sirupu
it: Frutta sciroppata
lt: Konservuoti vaisiai sirupe
nl: Fruit op siroop
pl: Owoce w syropie
pt: Conservas de frutas em xarope

en: Apricots in syrup
bg: Кайсии в сироп
de: Aprikosen in Sirup
es: Albaricoques en almíbar
fr: Abricots au sirop
hr: Marelice u sirupu
lt: Abrikosai sirupe
nl: Abrikozen op siroop

en: Canned drained apricots in light syrup
fr: Abricots au sirop léger appertisés égouttés